Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.501

Thurston county capital facilities account.

The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by the department in Thurston county.

During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the Thurston county capital facilities account may be appropriated for costs associated with staffing to support capital budget and project activities and lease and facility oversight activities. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the Thurston county capital facilities account may be appropriated for activities related to Capitol Lake long-term management planning, as provided in section 1057, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.

[ 2022 c 296 s 7011; 2021 c 332 s 7013; 2020 c 356 s 7005; 2018 c 2 s 7027. Prior: 2016 c 202 s 58; prior: 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7031; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 943; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 225; 2009 c 564 s 932; 2008 c 328 s 6016; 1994 c 219 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 296: See note following RCW 43.63A.125.

Effective date—2021 c 332: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 18, 2021]." [ 2021 c 332 s 7051.]

Effective date—2020 c 356: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 3, 2020]." [ 2020 c 356 s 7011.]

Effective date—2018 c 2: See note following RCW 28B.10.027.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 43.160.080.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2008 c 328: See notes following RCW 43.155.050.

Findings—Purpose—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.01.090.

Finding—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.88.030.